Connecticut, session 2026, HB05129.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
surcharge on high-value recreational vessels and dedicate the revenue
generated from such surcharge to reducing and eliminating the
property tax on motor vehicles.